Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-235
Amendments proposed by the Legislature; special election; vote of members; date held.

A special state election may be called by the vote of four-fifths of the members elected to the Legislature for the purpose of submitting proposed amendments to the Constitution to the electors. Such election shall be held on a date specified by the Legislature, which date shall fall on a Tuesday and be not less than sixty days after passage of the act calling such election.

Laws 1969, c. 260, § 1, p. 1002;

Laws 1988, LB 588, § 2.